Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 2

Tennessee Adventure Tourism and Rural Development Act of 2011

11-11-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Adventure Tourism and Rural Development Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 383, § 1.

11-11-202. Plan for promotion and development of adventure tourism and other recreation and economic development in rural areas.

The department of economic and community development, in cooperation with the department of environment and conservation, is directed to study and develop a plan for the promotion and development of adventure tourism and other recreational and economic development activities in rural areas of this state. Such study and plan shall be developed within existing departmental resources. The departments are directed to consider natural areas, best available science, existing recreational opportunities, economic conditions, including, but not limited to, persistent high unemployment, safety and environmental issues, and community interest in developing such plan. Such plan should include recommendations on whether and to what extent existing laws should be amended and any new laws should be enacted in order to encourage development of adventure tourism in this state. The department of environment and conservation and the department of tourist development are authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this part.

Acts 2011, ch. 383, § 1; 2016, ch. 845, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 845, § 5 provided that any certification for an adventure tourism district that was issued by the department of economic and community development, and that was in effect on July 1, 2015, shall not expire until the earlier of the date that the department of tourist development issues a new certification or approval for such district or one (1) year following the date that the department of tourist development promulgates rules or adopts official guidance concerning the process whereby local governments may apply for certification or approval for an adventure tourism district.

11-11-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adventure tourism” means outdoor recreational opportunities such as equine and motorized trail riding, white water rafting and kayaking, rappelling, road biking, rock climbing, hang-gliding, spelunking, shooting sports, mountain biking, canoeing, paragliding, rowing, zip lining and other such activities;

“Adventure tourism district” means a defined geographic area identified and authorized by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of a local governing body and approved by the department and the department of environment and conservation as an area where the promotion of adventure tourism is encouraged;

“All-terrain vehicle” means either:

A motorized vehicle with not less than four (4) nonhighway tires, nor more than six (6) nonhighway tires, that is limited in total dry weight up to two thousand five hundred pounds (2,500 lbs.), and is eighty inches (80") or less in width;

A motor vehicle as defined in § 55-1-103, which possesses a four-wheel drive capability and that is designed and suitable for operation off the highway on natural terrain; or

A motorized vehicle designed for or capable of cross-country travel on or immediately over land, water, snow, or other natural terrain and not intended for use on public roads traveling on two (2) wheels and having a seat or saddle designed to be straddled by the operator and handlebars for steering control;

“Best interests of the state” means a determination by the commissioner of revenue, with approval by the commissioner of tourist development, that:

The qualified business enterprise or enterprises made within or adjacent to an adventure tourism district is a result of the special allocation and tax credits provided for in § 67-4-2109(b)(2)(C);

The adventure tourism district is a result of such qualified business enterprise or enterprises; and

The zone is not structured to create a competitive advantage for one business;

“Canoeing” means the use of canoe for navigation of waterways;

“Department” means the department of tourist development;

“Hang-gliding” means an air sport in which a pilot flies a light and un-motorized aircraft launched by foot;

“Kayaking” means the use of a kayak for navigation of waterways;

“Local governing body” means the elected legislative body of a municipal, metropolitan or county government;

“Motorized trail riding” means the exploration of trails and natural areas by use of all-terrain vehicles;

“Mountain biking” means the exploration of trails and natural areas by the use of bicycles;

“Paragliding” means the air sport in which a pilot flies a light motorized aircraft that uses a parachute to stay airborne;

“Rappelling” is the controlled descent down a rope by climbers used to explore cliffs or slopes that are too steep to descend without protection;

“Road biking” means both noncompetitive and competitive bicycling events that take place on improved roads;

“Rock climbing” means the recreational sport of climbing up or across natural rock formations;

“Rowing” means the propelling of a boat by means of oars;

“Shooting sports” means the recreational sport of firing handguns, rifles or shotguns at moving or fixed targets;

“Spelunking” means the recreational sport of exploring noncommercial cave systems;

“Triathlon” means the recreational activity of sporting contests involving open waters swimming, bicycle riding, and running, whether on trails or improved roads;

“White water rafting” means the recreational activity of using an inflatable raft or kayak to navigate rough water; and

“Zip lining” means the exploration of natural areas by use of above-ground cable systems.

Acts 2011, ch. 383, § 1; 2012, ch. 867, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2013, ch. 378, § 1; 2016, ch. 845, § 2; 2016, ch. 1015, §§ 13, 14; 2018, ch. 585, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 845, § 5 provided that any certification for an adventure tourism district that was issued by the department of economic and community development, and that was in effect on July 1, 2015, shall not expire until the earlier of the date that the department of tourist development issues a new certification or approval for such district or one (1) year following the date that the department of tourist development promulgates rules or adopts official guidance concerning the process whereby local governments may apply for certification or approval for an adventure tourism district.

11-11-204. Creation of adventure tourism district.

A local governing body may, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote authorize the creation of a district within the boundaries of such governing body as an adventure tourism district by developing an adventure tourism district plan. Alternatively, one (1) or more counties or one (1) or more municipalities may enter into an intergovernmental agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 9, to designate jointly an adventure tourism district that contains area within the boundaries of more than one (1) local government.

Adventure tourism professionals may petition local governing bodies to authorize the creation of an adventure tourism district. Such petition shall be accompanied by specific business plans based on quantifiable data demonstrating that the creation of an adventure tourism district would enhance sustainable economic development in the area.

Upon a local governing body or bodies authorizing the creation of an adventure tourism district, the adventure tourism district plan shall be submitted to the department of tourist development and the department of revenue for joint approval as an adventure tourism district. Such approval shall be granted if the commissioner of tourist development and the commissioner of revenue determine that the allocation of franchise and excise tax credits are in the best interests of the state.

Following the approval of the department of tourist development and the department of revenue for an adventure tourism district pursuant to subsection (c), a local governing body may submit the adventure tourism district plan to:

The department of revenue for approval of tax credits pursuant to § 67-4-2109; and

The department of tourist development for promotional support through use of the department's existing resources.

Acts 2011, ch. 383, § 1; 2013, ch. 378, § 4; 2016, ch. 845, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 845, § 5 provided that any certification for an adventure tourism district that was issued by the department of economic and community development, and that was in effect on July 1, 2015, shall not expire until the earlier of the date that the department of tourist development issues a new certification or approval for such district or one (1) year following the date that the department of tourist development promulgates rules or adopts official guidance concerning the process whereby local governments may apply for certification or approval for an adventure tourism district.

11-11-205. Liability — Warning notices — Limitations.

Unless an adventure tourism professional or business acts intentionally or with gross negligence or is in violation of this part, or any other laws, ordinances, resolutions, rules or regulations pertaining to adventure tourism, which intentional or grossly negligent act or omission or violation is causal of the injury complained of, no action shall lie against any such professional or business by any adventure tourism activity participant or representative of an adventure tourism activity participant; this prohibition shall not, however, prevent the maintenance of an action against an adventure tourism professional or business for negligent design, construction or operation maintenance.

Each adventure tourism professional or business shall maintain general liability insurance with limits of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence.

Each adventure tourism professional or business shall post and maintain signs that contain the warning notice specified in subsection (d). The signs shall be placed in clearly visible locations at such businesses. The warning notice specified in subsection (d) shall appear on the sign in black letters, with each letter to be a minimum of one inch (1") in height. In addition to any other waivers or warnings signed by participants, every written contract entered into by an adventure tourism professional or business for the providing of professional services, instruction, or the rental of equipment to a participant, whether or not the contract involves activities on or off the location or site of the adventure tourism professional's business, shall contain in clearly readable print the warning notice specified in subsection (d).

The signs and contracts described in subsection (c) shall contain the following warning notice:

Under Tennessee Law, an adventure tourism professional is not liable for an injury to or the death of a participant in adventure tourism activities resulting from the inherent risks of such activities, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, title 11, chapter 11.

The State of Tennessee is held harmless for any act of approval of an adventure tourism business. State approval is limited to determining eligibility for tax credits only.

No action shall be maintained against an adventure tourism professional or business complying with this section unless such action is commenced within one (1) year from the date of injury.

Acts 2011, ch. 383, § 1; 2013, ch. 378, § 3.

11-11-206. Assistance by departments.

The department of environment and conservation and the department of tourist development may work together to provide assistance as deemed appropriate by the departments to encourage the development of adventure tourism within those regions of the state designated as suitable for such activities and where persistent high unemployment exists.

Acts 2011, ch. 383, § 1; 2016, ch. 845, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 845, § 5 provided that any certification for an adventure tourism district that was issued by the department of economic and community development, and that was in effect on July 1, 2015, shall not expire until the earlier of the date that the department of tourist development issues a new certification or approval for such district or one (1) year following the date that the department of tourist development promulgates rules or adopts official guidance concerning the process whereby local governments may apply for certification or approval for an adventure tourism district.